District of Columbia statutes.
29-904

Purposes for incorporation.

An association may be incorporated under this chapter to engage in any one or more lawful mode or modes of acquiring, producing, building, operating, manufacturing, furnishing, exchanging, or distributing any type or types of property, commodities, goods, or services for the primary and mutual benefit of the patrons of the association, or their patrons, if any, as ultimate consumers.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-903.
1981 Ed., § 29-1103.
1973 Ed., § 29-803.